District of Columbia statutes.
9-1203.07

Company to pay portion of cost of paving or repairing streets.

If and when the Mayor of the District of Columbia shall decide to pave or repave any of the streets over or along which tracks are authorized to be constructed, the railroad company shall be required to bear the expense of the paving and/or repairs to pavements between the rails and on either side of the tracks for a distance of 2 feet.

History

June 18, 1932, 47 Stat. 323, ch. 269, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1422.
1973 Ed., § 7-1222.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.